Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 229A.5C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. Upon the filing of a complaint, indictment, or information, the person shall be transferred to the county jail in the county where the public offense occurred until the criminal proceedings have been completed. b. If the person is sentenced to a term of confinement in a county jail, the person shall serve the sentence at the county jail. If the person is sentenced to the custody of the director of the department of corrections, the person shall serve the sentence at a correctional institution. c. (1) If a person who is subject to an order of civil commitment under this chapter is transferred to a county jail or sentenced to a term of confinement in a county jail pursuant to this subsection, the department shall reimburse the county at a rate of fifty dollars per day for the time period the person is temporarily held after transfer or is confined in the county jail. House File 643, p. 2 (2) The department shall use funds appropriated to the department for costs associated with the treatment and commitment of sexually violent predators in the unit located at the state mental health institute at Cherokee, or use funds transferred pursuant to section 218.6, for the payment of reimbursements pursuant to subparagraph (1). ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 643, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor